Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB156.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 156 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Kentucky Department of Education, in supporting school district adoption of
instructional materials and implementing curriculum, shall develop, for each
instructional materials collection adopted by the State Instructional Materials
Commission, a guide for educators that details:
(a) The academic standards addressed by the instructional materials;
(b) How the instructional materials are connected to specific learning targets
that are aligned to those academic standards;
(c) Questions students should be able to answer, skills students should be able
to demonstrate, and products students should be able to produce in
connection with the instructional materials, achieving learning targets, and
meeting the academic standard; and
(d) A curriculum guide for using the instructional materials with sample
instructional plans that provide a realistic instructional schedule for using
the materials over the school year.
(2) The guides shall be made available at no cost to all public school teachers and
administrators.
Section 2. KRS 156.395 is amended to read as follows:
For purposes of KRS 156.400 to 156.476, unless the context requires otherwise:[,]
(1) "Instructional materials" means tools used to assist in student learning, as defined in
administrative regulations promulgated by the Kentucky Board of Education; and
(2) "Instructional materials collection" means a system of interrelated instructional
materials offered by a publisher or developer to support learning of a specific
content area or grade level.
Page 1 of 17
XXXX 1/6/2025 5:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 348
Section 3. KRS 156.405 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The purpose of the State Instructional Materials[Textbook] Commission is to be
the sole provider of[provide] a recommended list of current and high quality
[textbooks and ]instructional materials to local school districts that complement the
educational program in Kentucky schools; to provide a consumer guide to schools
to aid with the selection of materials; and to provide for public participation in the
evaluation process. The State Instructional Materials Commission shall be
attached to the Kentucky Department of Education for administrative and
support purposes.
(2) The State Instructional Materials[Textbook] Commission shall consist of the chief
state school officer and ten (10) appointive members. The ten (10) members shall
be appointed by the Kentucky Board of Education upon the recommendation of the
chief state school officer for terms of four (4) years with two (2) appointments each
year, except that every fourth year there shall be four (4) appointments. No member
shall be eligible to serve more than two (2) full terms consecutively. All vacancies
that occur on the State Textbook Commission shall be filled in like manner for the
remainder of the unexpired terms. The Department of Education and the State
Instructional Materials[Textbook] Commission shall receive assistance in the
instructional materials[textbook] evaluation process from professionals and lay
citizens who will be referred to in this chapter as the "[textbook ]reviewers."
(3) The State Instructional Materials[Textbook] Commission shall:
(a) Select and direct the activities of the [textbook ]reviewers who develop
selection criteria and review instructional materials[textbooks and
programs];
(b) Develop selection criteria and evaluation forms with the help of the [textbook
]reviewers and Kentucky Department of Education staff to be used in the state
level review process;
Page 2 of 17
XXXX 1/6/2025 5:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 348
(c) Approve the evaluative criteria and forms used by the commission and
[textbook ]reviewers;
(d) Review the [textbook ]reviewers' evaluations, and instructional
materials[textbooks or programs] as it deems necessary, in order to select
from them a recommended list of high quality materials;
(e) Provide notice of and the opportunity for public inspection of instructional
materials collections[textbooks and programs] offered for adoption and use in
the public schools;
(f) Conduct a public hearing for the purpose of receiving public comment
concerning instructional materials collections[textbooks and programs]
under consideration;
(g) Select, recommend, and publish a list of high quality instructional materials
collections[textbooks and programs]; and
(h) Publish a consumer guide and distribute it to Kentucky public schools.
(4) The [textbook ]reviewers shall be comprised of twelve (12) individuals for the area
or areas being considered for adoption. The [textbook ]reviewers shall be approved
by the State Instructional Materials[Textbook] Commission based on the
recommendation of the chief state school officer.
(5) The [textbook ]reviewers shall:
(a) Develop and submit to the commission subject specific evaluative criteria to
be used in reviewing instructional materials[textbooks and programs];
(b) Review instructional materials collections[textbooks and programs] to
determine those of high quality, using evaluative criteria and forms approved
by the commission;
(c) Submit to the commission reviews and evaluative forms regarding reviewed
instructional materials collections[textbooks and programs];
(d) Attend meetings and training sessions as requested by the commission and the
Page 3 of 17
XXXX 1/6/2025 5:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 348
Department of Education; and
(e) Ensure that instructional materials[textbooks] are free from factual error.
(6) (a) 1. Eight (8) of the appointive members of the State Instructional
Materials[Textbook] Commission shall have had not less than five (5)
years teaching or supervising experience in the public schools of
Kentucky and shall have had at the time of their appointment at least
four (4) years of college training in a recognized institution of higher
education.
2. Five (5) members of the commission shall be classroom teachers
actively employed in the public schools of Kentucky as teachers in
subject field or fields for which the commission will select books.
3. Two (2) members shall be principals, supervisors, or superintendents of
public schools or public school systems.
4. One (1) member shall be a member of the faculty of a public institution
of higher education engaged in teacher preparation.
5. Two (2) members shall be lay citizens, one (1) of whom shall have a
child enrolled in a public school at the time of appointment.
(b) In recommending the members of the State Instructional
Materials[Textbook] Commission the chief state school officer shall give due
regard to representation from rural and urban areas and from the elementary,
middle, and high school levels when the educational levels are included in the
subject field or fields for which adoptions are to be made.
(7) [Textbook ]Reviewers shall have the following qualifications: Six (6) of the
textbook reviewers shall be instructional supervisors and classroom teachers in
various and appropriate grade levels primary through grade twelve (12), with
experience and training in the subject areas to be reviewed. One (1) reviewer shall
have expertise and training in learning theory as applied to the classroom situation.
Page 4 of 17
XXXX 1/6/2025 5:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 348
One (1) reviewer shall be a current or former university faculty member with
expertise in the content area of the textbooks to be reviewed. One (1) reviewer shall
have experience and training in development of instructional materials[readability
and formatting of textbooks]. Three (3) reviewers shall be parents, two (2) of whom
shall have a child currently enrolled in public schools in Kentucky.
(8) Members of the State Instructional Materials[Textbook] Commission shall receive
[fifty ($50) dollars per day and ]reimbursement for their actual expenses while
attending commission meetings. [Textbook ]Reviewers shall receive remuneration
based on the amount of textbooks and programs to be reviewed and criteria to be
developed as determined by the chief state school officer. [Textbook reviewers shall
be paid one hundred dollars ($100) per day, not to exceed one thousand dollars
($1,000) annually. Textbook ]Reviewers shall also receive reimbursement for actual
expenses while attending reviewer or commission meetings.
(9) The meetings of the State Instructional Materials[Textbook] Commission shall be
open to the public and shall be held at least once every quarter and notice of such
meeting shall be given in accordance with KRS 424.110 to 424.210.
(10) Not later than May 1 each year the chief state school officer shall call the State
Instructional Materials[Textbook] Commission into session. The members of the
State Instructional Materials[Textbook] Commission shall elect one (1) of its
voting members as chairman and shall adopt administrative regulations for the
procedure of the commission. The chief state school officer shall be the secretary of
the commission.
Section 4. KRS 156.415 is amended to read as follows:
Before instructional materials collections[textbooks and programs] offered for adoption
and use in public schools of Kentucky may be lawfully recommended and listed by the
State Instructional Materials[Textbook] Commission or purchased by any board of
education, the person, firm, or corporation offering the materials for adoption and use
Page 5 of 17
XXXX 1/6/2025 5:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 348
shall file with the chief state school officer:
(1) Copies of all textbooks, materials, and programs that the person, firm, or
corporation desires to offer for adoption and use, with a sworn statement of the list
price and the lowest wholesale price at which each of the titles is sold in any
adopting unit;
(2) A statement that all the titles offered for sale, adoption, and use, do comply with the
standards and specifications for instructional materials[textbooks] designated by
the chief state school officer as regards paper, binding, printing, illustrations,
subject matter, technological requirements, and other items included in the
standards and specifications;
(3) Copies of any revision or special editions of the instructional materials[textbooks]
and programs filed, with a statement describing in detail each point of difference
from the regular edition filed, and the list price and the lowest wholesale price at
which the revision or special edition is sold anywhere in the United States;
(4) A fee of ten dollars ($10)[five dollars ($5)] for each instructional materials
collection[book] filed[ except when a series of books is filed, in which case the fee
shall be five dollars ($5) for the first book and one dollar ($1) for each additional
book in the series]. The fee provided by this subsection shall be paid at each and
every adoption period;
(5) A bond running to the Commonwealth of Kentucky, executed by a surety company
authorized to do business in this state, in a sum not less than four thousand dollars
($4,000)[two thousand dollars ($2,000)] nor more than twenty thousand dollars
($20,000)[ten thousand dollars ($10,000)], to be determined by the chief state
school officer; and
(6) An affidavit certifying any instructional materials[textbook] the publisher or
developer[manufacturer] offers in the state to be free of factual error at the time[ the
publisher or manufacturer executes] a contract is executed.
Page 6 of 17
XXXX 1/6/2025 5:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 348
Section 5. KRS 156.433 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Board of Education, upon recommendation of the chief state school
officer, shall promulgate an administrative regulation identifying instructional
materials eligible for purchase with state [textbook ]funds. The regulation shall
identify instructional materials which are subject to review before being
recommended for use, establish a procedure for the review, and a process for
adding an instructional material to the recommended list. [The Department of
Education may pay instructional materials reviewers an amount not to exceed one
thousand dollars ($1,000) annually per reviewer for their services using funds from
the appropriation for state textbooks.]
(2) The Department of Education shall establish a list of recommended instructional
materials for the use of school personnel.
Section 6. KRS 156.474 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Board of Education, upon the recommendation of the chief state
school officer, shall have the authority to prescribe the conditions whereby a school
district may make multiple instructional materials collection[textbook] adoptions
for the different school subjects by grades.
(2) The Kentucky Board of Education, upon the recommendation of the chief state
school officer, shall have the authority to prescribe the administrative regulations to
govern the purchase of the multiple-adopted instructional materials
collections[textbooks] for the school district.[ The chief state school officer, subject
to the approval of the Kentucky Board of Education, may purchase the textbooks
from the publishers whose books have been adopted by the school district for
grades kindergarten through twelve (12) and distribute them without cost to the
pupils attending the public schools in the school district.]
Section 7. KRS 156.407 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The chief state school officer shall, not later than February 1 of each year in which
Page 7 of 17
XXXX 1/6/2025 5:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 348
an adoption is to be made, solicit applications for filling twelve (12) positions for
[textbook ]reviewers.
(2) Solicitation shall be statewide for all appointments and include specifications which
ensure candidates have professional expertise in the subject areas to be reviewed if
appropriate for the appointment.
(3) The State Instructional Materials[Textbook] Commission, at its first yearly
meeting, shall select [textbook ]reviewers based on a list of qualified applicants
prepared by the chief state school officer and giving consideration to the
recommendations as specified in KRS 156.405.
(4) The Department of Education's curriculum and instruction specialists shall serve as
staff to the commission and reviewers. The staff shall:
(a) Orient and train the commission and reviewers regarding departmental policy
and review procedures;
(b) Make available existing standards and criteria for [textbook ]evaluation; and
(c) Provide supplies and sample instructional materials collections[textbooks]
for the review process.
(5) The [textbook ]reviewers shall develop subject specific criteria for instructional
materials collections[textbook] review and evaluation in the following [textbook
]areas:
(a) Subject content, including its relationship to the academic
standards[expectations];
(b) Audience;
(c) Format;
(d) Readability and use;
(e) Accuracy; and
(f) Associated[Ancillary] materials and resources.
(6) On or before July 15, the State Instructional Materials[Textbook] Commission
Page 8 of 17
XXXX 1/6/2025 5:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 348
shall develop general criteria, review and approve subject specific criteria, and
provide the standard criteria and evaluation forms to be used by the commission
and [textbook ]reviewers.
(7) Based upon approval of the standard criteria and evaluation forms, the [textbook
]reviewers shall review instructional materials collections[textbooks and
programs]. The committee shall submit evaluation forms for each instructional
materials collection[textbook or program] reviewed in each of the five (5) areas, set
forth in subsection (5) of this section, with comments related to strengths and
weaknesses in each area.
(8) The State Instructional Materials[Textbook] Commission shall review the work of
the [textbook ]reviewers and based on this review and any of its own reviews of
instructional materials collection[textbooks or programs], establish a state multiple
list of recommended instructional materials collection[textbooks and programs].
The list of recommended collections[textbooks and programs] shall be free of
factual error. Copies of all evaluation forms submitted by the [textbook ]reviewers
shall be made available to commission members and maintained on file within the
Department of Education for the length of the adoption cycle[cycle length of the
books]. For those materials placed on the state multiple list of recommended
collections[textbooks and programs], the Department of Education shall publish a
consumer guide that includes summary results of the evaluations and any factual
error identified in the instructional materials[textbooks], and shall distribute it to
all public schools in the state.
Section 8. KRS 156.410 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The chief state school officer shall prepare minimum [manufacturing ]standards,
delineate content specifications, in accordance with the content standards and
curriculum requirements of the program of studies for Kentucky schools: grades K-
12, and formulate other criteria for use in the evaluation of instructional
Page 9 of 17
XXXX 1/6/2025 5:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 348
materials[textbooks and programs] in Kentucky. Criteria shall require that all
materials be suitable for use with a diverse population and be free of social, ethnic,
racial, religious, age, gender, and geographic bias.
(2) It shall be the duty of the chief state school officer to prepare all necessary forms
for use in the evaluation of instructional materials[textbooks and programs], such
as advertising for [textbook ]bids; forms for bids, bonds, and contracts; and other
forms.
(3) The Kentucky Board of Education, upon the recommendation of the chief state
school officer, shall have authority to promulgate administrative
regulations[prescribe]:
(a) [Administrative regulations ]Pertaining to all instructional
materials[textbook] samples for use on the state and local levels; and
(b) [Shall have authority to promulgate administrative regulations ]Relating to the
agents and representatives of instructional materials collection publishers or
developers[textbooks and programs], as to the methods and procedures for use
in adoptions on the state and local levels.
(4) The chief state school officer, on or before May 1 prior to any adoption year, shall
properly advertise the subjects for which instructional materials[textbook]
adoptions will be made and notify the different publishers and developers[ of the
textbooks]. The publishers and developers, on or before July 15, of any adoption
year, shall file with the chief state school officer instructional materials
collection[textbook] samples, filing fees, [textbook ]bids and bonds, and other
specified information relative to the instructional materials collections[books] that
they desire to offer for adoption.
(5) The chief state school officer shall:
(a) Review the bid information submitted by the publishers and developers;
(b) Verify that the bid complies with the specifications; and
Page 10 of 17
XXXX 1/6/2025 5:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 348
(c) Prepare a list of instructional materials collections[textbooks and programs],
for consideration by the State Instructional Materials[Textbook] Commission
indicating those in compliance with the standards and specifications and those
not in compliance, detailing areas of noncompliance.
Section 9. KRS 156.420 is amended to read as follows:
The bond required by the person, firm, or corporation offering instructional
materials[the books] for adoption shall be so conditioned that:
(1) The person, firm, or corporation will furnish any of the instructional
materials[books] listed in the statement filed for the period of adoption from the
date of the bond to any school district in Kentucky, or to any dealer appointed by
the district, at the lowest wholesale price contained in the statement, f.o.b. the
publisher's nearest shipping point;
(2) The person, firm, or corporation shall not bid and enter into a contract for an
adoption period with the Commonwealth of Kentucky for instructional
materials[books] at a higher wholesale price than is being bid for the same adoption
period elsewhere in the United States.
(3) The person, firm, or corporation will automatically reduce such prices in Kentucky
whenever reductions are made anywhere in the United States, so that no
instructional material[book] shall at any time be sold in Kentucky at a higher
wholesale price than is received for that instructional material[book] elsewhere in
the United States;
(4) If the person, firm, or corporation prepared an abridged or special edition of any
book that has been listed and sells it elsewhere at a lower wholesale price than the
wholesale price set out in the filed statement, the person will file a copy of the
special edition with the price of the special edition in a supplemental statement with
the chief state school officer;
(5) All instructional materials[books] sold in Kentucky will be identical with the
Page 11 of 17
XXXX 1/6/2025 5:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 348
specimens[specimen books] filed with the chief state school officer as regards size,
paper, binding, print, illustrations, subject matter, technological specifications, and
other particulars which may affect the value of the instructional materials[books];
(6) The person, firm, or corporation shall not enter into any agreement, understanding,
or combination to control the price of instructional materials[textbooks] or to
restrict competition in their sale in Kentucky.
Section 10. KRS 156.425 is amended to read as follows:
The form of the sworn statement and bond required shall be prescribed by the chief state
school officer. The bond shall be in force for the adoption period. The person, firm, or
corporation may at any time while the bond is in force file a supplemental statement
covering additional instructional materials[books] or special editions of instructional
materials[books] previously filed. The supplemental statement shall expire at the date of
expiration of the original statement and bond. Prior to the expiration of any statement and
bond the person may file a new statement and bond for a further period of adoption, and
if he fails to file a new statement and bond his right to offer instructional
materials[textbooks] for adoption and use in the public schools of Kentucky shall expire
on the date of expiration of the former bond.
Section 11. KRS 156.435 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The State Instructional Materials[Textbook] Commission shall, not later than
September 20 of any year in which an adoption is to be made, select, recommend,
and publish a list of instructional materials collections[books or programs] in each
subject and grade, taking into account the needs of the various types of students.
(2) The State Instructional Materials[Textbook] Commission shall have the authority
to reject any instructional material[book] which:
(a) Contains subversive material or information that is offered for listing or
adoption. If the commission finds on the multiple list any instructional
material[book] which contains subversive material or information, provided
Page 12 of 17
XXXX 1/6/2025 5:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 348
the publisher or developer[of the book] has been given written notice by the
secretary of the commission not less than thirty (30) days prior to the meeting,
the [textbook ]commission shall have authority to remove the material[book]
from the state multiple list;
(b) Is in noncompliance with standards and specifications set forth in KRS
156.410; or
(c) Is not of high quality in terms of the content provided, the audience addressed,
the format used, technological specifications, the readability and usability of
material or the ancillary materials provided the teacher and students.
(3) The State Instructional Materials[Textbook] Commission shall have the authority
to solicit additions for the state list when the list does not contain [books or
]materials for subjects added to the state courses of study.
(4) The chief state school officer shall make and execute contracts for the
recommended instructional materials collections[textbooks and programs] with the
publishers or developers on or before May 1 following the establishment of the
state multiple list of recommended materials[titles] selected by the commission.
Except as described in KRS 156.400, all contracts shall run for six (6) years.
(5) The chief state school officer shall prepare a multiple list of recommended
instructional materials collections[textbooks or programs] and publish the list
along with a consumer guide and distribute the documents to the superintendents of
each county and independent school district in Kentucky on or before November 15
of each adoption year.
Section 12. KRS 156.437 is amended to read as follows:
The Kentucky Board of Education, upon the recommendation of the chief state school
officer, shall have the authority to prescribe administrative regulations for the
recommended listing by the State Instructional Materials[Textbook] Commission,
adoption by local adoption units, and the purchase of subject programs for the pupils in
Page 13 of 17
XXXX 1/6/2025 5:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 348
the public schools.
Section 13. KRS 156.438 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Board of Education shall promulgate administrative regulations to
establish procedures for reviewing and resolving claims of factual errors found in
instructional materials[textbooks] after adoption by the State Instructional
Materials[Textbook] Commission.
(2) The administrative regulations shall include:
(a) A process for an individual who believes that a factual error or errors have
been found to file notice of his or her findings;
(b) A methodology for validating the accuracy of a claim of factual error;
(c) The development of conditions to include in publishers' or developers'
contracts specifying protocols for correcting errors which take into account
the following:
1. The extensiveness of the errors found;
2. The remaining time left until the next instructional materials[textbook]
adoption cycle at the time the claim is determined to be valid;
3. Conditions that would necessitate replacement of printed instructional
material[a book] in its entirety or correction of a digital instructional
material; and
4. Conditions that could be addressed through the insertion of corrections
in a printed instructional material[textbooks] without replacement;
(d) Notice to school districts of errors, if found, and the resolution determined to
be available; and
(e) Notice to the claimant relative to the validation review and the resolution
determined to be available if the claim of error was validated.
Section 14. KRS 156.440 is amended to read as follows:
Publishers and developers, upon the request of the superintendents of the county and
Page 14 of 17
XXXX 1/6/2025 5:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 348
independent school districts, shall furnish to the local boards of education the requested
sample copies of their materials that were selected and placed on the state multiple list of
recommended instructional materials[textbooks] by the State Instructional
Materials[Textbook] Commission.
Section 15. KRS 156.445 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No instructional materials collection[textbook or program] shall be used in any
public school in Kentucky as a basal instructional material[title] unless it has been
recommended and listed on the state multiple list by the State Instructional
Materials[Textbook] Commission or unless a school and district has met the
notification requirements under subsection (2) of this section. Any changes of
instructional materials[textbooks] made by the State Instructional
Materials[Textbook] Commission shall not become effective until grades and
classes of the respective county and independent school districts have completed
work for which the adopted instructional materials[book] then in use was
originally intended. Nothing in this section shall apply to the supplementary
instructional materials[books] that are needed from time to time.
(2) A superintendent[school council, or if none exists, the principal,] may notify[,
through the superintendent,] the State Instructional Materials[Textbook]
Commission that the district[it] plans to adopt a basal instructional materials
collection[textbook or program] that is not on the recommended list by submitting
evidence that the instructional materials collection[title] it has chosen meets the
selection criteria of the State Instructional Materials[Textbook] Commission in
KRS 156.405(3)(b) and the subject specific criteria of the [textbook ]reviewers
pursuant to KRS 156.407(5) and complies with the required [publisher
]specifications.
(3) In approving instructional[text] materials for private and parochial schools for the
purpose of KRS 156.160(3) the [text ]materials shall be approved if they are
Page 15 of 17
XXXX 1/6/2025 5:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 348
comprehensive and appropriate to the grade level in question notwithstanding the
fact that they may contain elements of religious philosophy.
Section 16. KRS 156.460 is amended to read as follows:
No superintendent, teacher, or other official or employee of any institution supported
wholly or in part by public funds shall act, directly or indirectly, as agent for any person
whose instructional materials[school textbooks] are filed with the chief state school
officer.
Section 17. KRS 156.465 is amended to read as follows:
No person shall secure or attempt to secure the adoption of any instructional
materials[school textbook] in any school district in this state, by rewarding or promising
to reward, directly or indirectly, any person in any public school district in the state. No
person shall offer or give any emolument to any person in any school district in this state
for any vote or promise to vote, or the use of his influence, for any instructional
materials[school textbook] to be used in this state.
Section 18. KRS 156.470 is amended to read as follows:
A copy of all recommended instructional materials[titles] listed by the State
Instructional Materials[Textbook] Commission shall remain in an office specified by the
chief state school officer as an official sample for the period of the adoption.
Section 19. KRS 156.476 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Board of Education, upon the recommendation of the chief state
school officer, shall select suitable instructional materials collections[textbooks
and programs] in an appropriate format, which include braille textbooks, and other
materials available in clear type of eighteen (18) to twenty-four (24) points in the
different subject areas for children with impaired vision who are attending the
public schools of the Commonwealth of Kentucky in grades kindergarten through
twelve (12). These books and materials shall not be subject to the official bids,
filing fees, sampling, and the stipulated list prices, lowest wholesale prices, and the
Page 16 of 17
XXXX 1/6/2025 5:02 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 348
standards and specifications required for the books and materials approved and
listed by the State Instructional Materials[Textbook] Commission for regular use
by the pupils attending the public schools of the State of Kentucky. The Kentucky
Board of Education, upon the recommendation of the chief state school officer, may
promulgate an administrative regulation determining the pupils eligible for the
books and materials, the number of books and types of materials to be purchased,
and the general administration of the program. The chief state school officer,
subject to the approval of the Kentucky Board of Education, may purchase these
books and materials and distribute them without cost to the pupils with impaired
vision attending the public schools of the state. All instructional materials[books
and programs] purchased under this section for the pupils with impaired vision are
the property of the state.
(2) The Department of Education shall require any publisher or developer of an
instructional materials collection[a textbook or program] adopted for use in the
public schools of the Commonwealth to furnish the American Printing House for
the Blind with [computer diskettes or tapes of ]those [print ]materials [either in the
American Standard Code for Information Interchange, (ASCII), or ]in any [other]
format, either electronic or print, which can be readily translated into braille or
large print.
Page 17 of 17
XXXX 1/6/2025 5:02 PM Jacketed